Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5795YH (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2018 Section 1. Section 331.908, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 331.908 Motor vehicles required to operate on ethanol blended 3 gasoline. 4 A motor vehicle purchased or used by a county to provide 5 county services shall not operate on gasoline other than 6 ethanol blended gasoline as defined in section 214A.1 . The 7 motor vehicle shall also be affixed with a brightly visible 8 sticker which notifies the traveling public that the motor 9 vehicle is being operated on ethanol blended gasoline. 10 However, the sticker is not required to be affixed to an 11 unmarked vehicle used for purposes of providing law enforcement 12 or security. 13 Sec. 2. Section 364.20, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 364.20 Motor vehicles required to operate on ethanol blended 16 gasoline. 17 A motor vehicle purchased or used by a city to provide city 18 services shall not operate on gasoline other than ethanol 19 blended gasoline as defined in section 214A.1 . The motor 20 vehicle shall also be affixed with a brightly visible sticker 21 which notifies the traveling public that the motor vehicle 22 is being operated on ethanol blended gasoline. However, the 23 sticker is not required to be affixed to an unmarked vehicle 24 used for purposes of providing law enforcement or security. 25